District of Columbia statutes.
28:9-803

Security interest perfected before applicability date.

(a)

A security interest that is a perfected security interest immediately before the applicability date is a perfected security interest under Article 9 as amended by the 2012 Act if, on the applicability date, the applicable requirements for attachment and perfection under Article 9 as amended by 2012 Act are satisfied without further action.

(b)

Except as otherwise provided in § 28:9-805, if, immediately before the applicability date, a security interest is a perfected security interest, but the applicable requirements for perfection under Article 9 as amended by the 2012 Act are not satisfied on the applicability date, the security interest remains perfected thereafter only if the applicable requirements for perfection under Article 9 as amended by the 2012 Act are satisfied within one year after the applicability date.

May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-302, § 2(s), 60 DCR 2688
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-302: Section 4 of D.C. Law 19-302 provided that the act shall apply as of July 1, 2013.